Connecticut, session 2026, HB05293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 27-122a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services
shall transfer to the Veterans' Home and Hospital Commission two
certain pieces or parcels of land known as Plot # 6, containing thirty
acres, more or less, situated on the north side of River Road in the town
of Middletown, county of Middlesex, and state of Connecticut, and
being bounded and described as follows: As to the first piece or parcel;
Commencing at a point in the northerly side of River Road being the
southeast corner of the land herein described, thence running N 31
degrees E a distance of 286 feet, more or less, to the right-of-way of the
Penn Central Railroad (Valley Line), thence running westerly along said
right-of-way a distance of 2720 feet, more or less, thence running
southerly 80 feet, more or less, to River Road, thence running
LCO No. 716 1 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5293
southeasterly along the northern boundary of River Road a distance of
530 feet, more or less, to a brook, thence running N 80 degrees E along
the north side of River Road to a bend in said road a distance of 380 feet,
more or less, thence S 82 degrees E a distance of 1160 feet, more or less
along the northern side of River Road to the point and place of
beginning. As to the second piece or parcel of land being a small piece
or parcel located on the northerly side of the Penn Central Railroad
(Valley Line) right-of-way, bounded on the northerly and westerly side
by the Connecticut River and on the southerly side by said railroad
right-of-way and on the easterly side by property of the Feldspar
Corporation. Said two pieces or parcels of land contain a total area of
thirty acres, more or less, and are shown on a map or plan titled, "The
Connecticut State Hospital Middletown, Conn. Scale 1″ = 200′ 1922".
[(b)] (2) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services
shall transfer to the Veterans' Home certain land in the city of
Middletown, under the supervision and control of said commissioner,
in exchange for the transfer by the Veterans' Home and Hospital
Commission to the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction
Services of certain land comprised of pieces and parcels of the land
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection [(a)] of equal acreage, the
exact boundaries of the lands to be exchanged to be decided by the
Commissioner of Administrative Services, with the advice and
assistance of all parties within the six-month period following June 14,
1979.
[(c)] (3) The land transferred to the commission under [subsections
(a) and (b)] subdivisions (1) and (2) of this [section] subsection and not
transferred to the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction
Services and the Connecticut Valley Hospital shall be used by the
Commissioner of Veterans Affairs for the establishment and
maintenance of a veterans' cemetery.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs
shall designate one or more parcels of land already under the custody
LCO No. 716 2 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5293
and control of the state, or newly acquire one or more parcels of land in
the state, for the establishment and maintenance of a veterans' cemetery
in addition to the veterans' cemetery established and maintained under
subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. Section 27-122b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(a) As used in this section, "veteran" means any person who is a
veteran, as defined in section 27-103, who (1) has completed at least
twenty years of qualifying service, as described in and computed under
10 USC Chapter 1223, as amended from time to time, in the Connecticut
National Guard; or (2) was killed in action, or who died as a result of
accident or illness sustained while performing active service, in the
United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Coast Guard or
Space Force or any women's auxiliary branch thereof, organized
pursuant to an Act of Congress, or in the Connecticut National Guard.
(b) (1) Any veteran may, by letter or other communication addressed
to the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs, or by will, request that upon
his or her death his or her body be buried in [a veterans' cemetery] one
of the veterans' cemeteries established pursuant to section 27-122a, as
amended by this act, or (2) the spouse or other next of kin of any such
veteran may apply to the commissioner to have the body of such veteran
buried in [said veterans' cemetery, and in] one of said veterans'
cemeteries. In either case under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection,
such request shall be granted.
(c) (1) Any member or former member of the armed forces, as defined
in subsection (a) of section 27-103, who is a resident of this state and is
entitled to retirement pay under 10 USC Chapter 1223, as amended from
time to time, or would have been entitled to retirement pay under said
chapter [,] but for the fact that [the person] such member or former
member is under sixty years of age, may by letter or other
communication addressed to the commissioner, or by will, request that
LCO No. 716 3 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5293
upon his or her death his or her body will be buried in [said veterans'
cemetery] one of the veterans' cemeteries established pursuant to
section 27-122a, as amended by this act, or (2) the spouse or other next
of kin of any such member or former member may apply to the
commissioner to have the body of such member or former member
buried in [said veterans' cemetery, and, in] one of said veterans'
cemeteries. In either case under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection,
such request shall be granted.
(d) (1) (A) Any person who served in the Hmong Laotian special
guerilla units, which units served in the United States secret war in the
Kingdom of Laos during the Vietnam War, may, by letter or other
communication addressed to the commissioner, or by will, request that
upon his or her death his or her body be buried in [a veterans' cemetery]
one of the veterans' cemeteries established pursuant to section 27-122a,
as amended by this act, or (B) the spouse or other next of kin of any such
person may apply to the commissioner to have the body of such person
buried in [said veterans' cemetery, and in] one of said veterans'
cemeteries. In either case under subparagraph (A) or (B) of this
subdivision, such request shall be granted.
(2) Such person who served in the Hmong Laotian special guerilla
units, or the spouse or next of kin of such person, shall provide to the
commissioner (A) an affidavit stating (i) when the person served, (ii)
100 where the person served, (iii) the unit in which the person served, and
101 (iv) the capacity in which the person served; (B) any available
102 corroborating witness affidavits; (C) any available official
103 documentation of service; and (D) any other documents supporting the
104 affidavit.
105 (e) The spouse of any veteran, or the spouse of any person who served
106 in the Hmong Laotian special guerilla units described in subsection (d)
107 of this section, shall, upon similar request or application made to the
108 commissioner, be buried in [said veterans' cemetery] one of said
109 veterans' cemeteries, provided only one such request or application
LCO No. 716 4 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5293
110 shall be granted.
111 (f) The commissioner shall designate an area in [said veterans'
112 cemetery] one of said veterans' cemeteries for veterans and any persons
113 who served in the Hmong Laotian special guerilla units described in
114 subsection (d) of this section who, for religious reasons, require burial
115 in a consecrated area.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 27-122a
Sec. 2 July 1, 2027 27-122b